Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 5
EXCLUSION OF TERRITORY

32-1-501. Exclusion of property by fee owners or board - procedure.

The boundaries of a special district, except health service districts, may be altered by the exclusion of real property by the fee owner or owners of one hundred percent of any real property situate in the special district filing with the board a petition requesting that such real property of the fee owner or owners be excluded and taken from the special district. The petition shall set forth a legal description of the property, shall state that assent to the exclusion of the property from the special district is given by the fee owner or owners thereof, and shall be acknowledged by the fee owner or owners in the same manner as required for conveyance of land. The petition shall be accompanied by a deposit of money sufficient to pay all costs of the exclusion proceedings.

(1.5) (a) In addition to the procedure specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board, through adoption of a resolution, may alter the boundaries of a fire protection district through the exclusion of real property from the district if the property to be excluded will be provided with the same service by another fire protection district or by a county fire improvement district and the board or governing body of that district has agreed by resolution to include the property into the district immediately after the effective date of the exclusion order.

Not more than forty-five days nor less than thirty days prior to a meeting of the board to consider final adoption of a resolution proposing property to be excluded, the secretary of the fire protection district shall send letter notification to the fee owner or owners of one hundred percent of all proposed real property to be excluded from the district as listed on the records of the county assessor on the date requested.

The letter notification shall indicate that it is a notice of a meeting required to be held pursuant to subsection (2) of this section concerning the exclusion of the property from the district, shall indicate the date, time, and location of the meeting, and shall contain both a reference to the fire protection district or county fire improvement district proposed for inclusion and the current mill levy of the district, if any.

The mailing of the letter notification to all addresses or post office box addresses within the area proposed to be excluded from the district shall constitute a good-faith effort to comply with this section, and failure to so notify all fee owners shall not provide grounds for a challenge to the meeting being held.

The board shall hear the petition or resolution at a public meeting after publication of notice of the filing of the petition or preliminary adoption of the resolution, the place, time, and date of the meeting, the names and addresses of the petitioners, if applicable, a general description of the area proposed for exclusion, and notice that all persons interested shall appear at the designated time and place and show cause in writing why the petition should not be granted or the resolution should not be finally adopted. The board may continue the hearing to a subsequent meeting. There shall be no withdrawal from a petition after publication of notice by the board without the consent of the board. The failure of any person in the existing special district to file a written objection shall be taken as an assent on his or her part to the exclusion of the area described in the notice.

The board shall take into consideration and make a finding regarding all of the following factors when determining whether to grant or deny the petition or to finally adopt the resolution or any portion thereof:

The best interests of all of the following:

The property to be excluded;

The special district from which the exclusion is proposed;

The county or counties in which the special district is located;

The relative cost and benefit to the property to be excluded from the provision of the special district's services;

The ability of the special district to provide economical and sufficient service to both the property to be excluded and all of the properties within the special district's boundaries;

Whether the special district is able to provide services at a reasonable cost compared with the cost that would be imposed by other entities in the surrounding area to provide similar services in the surrounding area or by the fire protection district or county fire improvement district that has agreed to include the property to be excluded from the special district;

The effect of denying the petition on employment and other economic conditions in the special district and surrounding area;

The economic impact on the region and on the special district, surrounding area, and state as a whole if the petition is denied or the resolution is finally adopted;

Whether an economically feasible alternative service may be available; and

The additional cost to be levied on other property within the special district if the exclusion is granted.

Except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a) and if the board, after considering all of the factors set forth in subsection (3) of this section, determines that the property described in the petition or resolution or some portion thereof should be excluded from the special district, it shall order that the petition be granted or that the resolution be finally adopted, in whole or in part.
(4) (a) (I) Except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a) and if the board, after considering all of the factors set forth in subsection (3) of this section, determines that the property described in the petition or resolution or some portion thereof should be excluded from the special district, it shall order that the petition be granted or that the resolution be finally adopted, in whole or in part.

If the property to be excluded from the special district will be served by a special district not yet organized, the board shall not order that the petition be granted or that the resolution be finally adopted until the special district has been organized pursuant to part 3 of this article.

If the property to be excluded from the special district will be served by a fire protection district or county fire improvement district as provided in subsection (1.5) of this section, the board shall not order that the petition be granted or that the resolution be finally adopted until the fire protection district or county fire improvement district has adopted a resolution agreeing to include the property in the district immediately after the effective date of the exclusion order and has filed the resolution with the court.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article to the contrary, the property to be excluded may be included within the boundaries of the proposed special district.

Upon granting the petition or finally adopting the resolution, the board shall file a certified copy of the order of the board excluding the property from the district with the clerk of the court, and, except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection (4), the court shall order the property to be excluded from the special district and, if applicable, included into the fire protection district or county fire improvement district that has previously agreed to include the property as provided in subsection (1.5) of this section.

If the property to be excluded from the special district will be served by a fire protection district or county fire improvement district that has previously agreed to include the property as provided in subsection (1.5) of this section and that has a higher mill levy than the special district and after the certified copy of the order of the board excluding the property from the district is filed with the clerk of the court, the court shall direct the question of excluding the area from the special district and including it in the fire protection district or county fire improvement district with a higher mill levy to the eligible electors of the area sought to be excluded. The court shall order the secretary to give published notice, as provided in part 2 of article 5 and article 13.5 of title 1, of the time and place of the election and of the question to be submitted, together with a summary of any conditions attached to the proposed exclusion. The election shall be held within the area sought to be excluded and shall be held and conducted, and the results thereof determined, in the manner provided in article 13.5 of title 1. The ballot shall be prepared by the designated election official and shall contain the following words:

If a majority of the votes cast at the election pursuant to subsection (4)(c)(I) of this section are in favor of exclusion to become a part of another district and the court determines the election was held in accordance with article 13.5 of title 1, the court shall enter an order with any conditions so prescribed excluding the area from the special district and including it in the fire protection district or county fire improvement district with a higher mill levy. The validity of the exclusion to become a part of another district may not be questioned directly or indirectly in any suit, action, or proceeding, except as provided in article 11 of title 1.

The order of exclusion entered pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection (4) shall recite in the findings a description of any bonded indebtedness in existence immediately preceding the effective date of the order for which the excluded property is liable and the date that the bonded indebtedness is then scheduled to be retired. After July 1, 1993, failure of the order for exclusion to recite the existence and scheduled retirement date of the indebtedness, when due to error or omission by the special district, shall not constitute grounds for correction of the omission of a levy on the excluded property from the assessment roll pursuant to section 39-5-125, C.R.S.

If the board, after considering all of the factors set forth in subsection (3) of this section, determines that the property described in the petition or resolution should not be excluded from the special district, it shall order that the petition be denied or that the resolution be rescinded.

Any petition that is denied or resolution that is finally adopted may be appealed to the board of county commissioners of the county in which the special district's petition for organization was filed for review of the board's decision. The appeal shall be taken no later than thirty days after the decision.

Upon appeal, the board shall consider the factors set forth in subsection (3) of this section and shall make a determination whether to exclude the properties mentioned in the petition or resolution based on the record developed at the hearing before the special district board.

Any decision of the board of county commissioners may be appealed for review to the district court of the county which has jurisdiction of the special district pursuant to section 32-1-303 within thirty days of such board's decision.

On appeal, the court shall review the record developed at the hearing before the special district board and, after considering all of the factors set forth in subsection (3) of this section, shall make a determination whether to exclude the properties mentioned in the petition or resolution.

"Shall the following described area be excluded from the ____________ district, which has a current mill levy of ____________, and become a part of the _____________ district, which has a current mill levy of ____________, and upon the following conditions, if any?

(Insert general description of area)
(Insert accurate summary of conditions)

For exclusion from __________ district and inclusion
in __________ district ______
Against exclusion from __________ district _____"

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1558, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(3) R&RE and (4) and (5) added, pp. 1149, 1150, §§ 1, 2, effective June 11.

L. 93:

(4)(b) amended, p. 83, § 1, effective March 29.

L. 94:

(1.5) added and (2), IP(3), (3)(a)(I), (3)(a)(II), (3)(b) to (3)(d), (3)(f), (4), (5)(a), (5)(b), and (5)(c)(II) amended, p. 1347, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 474, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(4)(c) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 784, § 83, effective June 6.

L. 2021:

(4)(c)(I) and (4)(c)(II) amended, (SB 21-160), ch. 133, p. 539, § 10, effective September 7.

32-1-502. Exclusion of property within municipality - procedure.

The governing body of any municipality wherein territory within a special district is located, the board of any special district with territory within the boundaries of any municipality, or fifty percent of the fee owners of real property in an area of any municipality in which territory within a special district is located may petition the court for exclusion of the territory described in the petition from the special district. Within ten days after the filing of any petition for exclusion, the governing body of the municipality and the board shall be notified of the exclusion proceedings. The taxpaying electors shall be notified of the exclusion proceedings by publication. The governing body of the municipality, the board, and the taxpaying electors, as a class, shall be parties to the exclusion proceedings.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to health service districts.

The provisions of this section shall not apply in the event that the territory described in the petition for exclusion constitutes the entire territory of the special district.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (5) of this section, the court shall hold a hearing on the petition and order the territory described in the petition or any portion thereof excluded from the special district if the following conditions are met:

The governing body of the municipality agrees, by resolution, to provide the service provided by the special district to the area described in the petition on and after the effective date of the exclusion order.

The service to be provided by the municipality will be the service provided by the special district in the territory described in the petition for exclusion.

The governing body of the municipality and the board shall each submit a plan for the disposition of assets and continuation of services to all areas of the district. Said plans shall include, if applicable, provisions for the maintenance and continuity of facilities to be utilized by the territories both within and without the municipal boundaries and of services to all territories served or previously served by the special district. If the municipality and the special district agree upon a single plan and enter into a contract incorporating its provisions, the court shall review such contract, and if it finds the contract to be fair and equitable, the court shall approve the contract and incorporate its provisions into its exclusion order. The court's review of the provisions of the contract shall include, but not be limited to, consideration of the amount of the special district's outstanding bonds, the discharge by the municipality or the territory excluded from the special district of that portion of the special district's indebtedness incurred to serve the territory proposed for exclusion, the fair market value and source of special district facilities located within the territory proposed for exclusion, the facilities to be transferred which are necessary to serve the territory proposed for exclusion, the adequacy of the facilities retained by the special district to serve the remaining territory of the special district, the availability of the facilities transferred to the municipality for use, in whole or in part, in the remaining territory of the special district, the effect which the transfer of the facilities and assumption of indebtedness will have upon the service provided by the special district in territory which is not part of the exclusion, and the extent to which the exclusion reduces the services or facilities or increases the costs to users in the remaining territory of the special district.

If the municipality and the special district are unable to agree upon a single plan, the court shall review the plans of the municipality and the special district and direct each to carry out so much of their respective plans in which there is no disagreement and make such other provisions as the court finds fair and equitable, and shall make such allocation of facilities, impose such responsibilities for the discharge of indebtedness of the special district, and impose such other conditions and obligations on the special district and the municipality which the court finds necessary to permit the exclusion of territory from the special district and the transfer of facilities which are necessary to serve the territory excluded without impairing the quality of service nor imposing an additional burden or expense on the remaining territory of the special district. For the purpose of making such determination, the criteria set forth in this paragraph (d) and paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection (2) shall be considered. The respective portions of the plans to be performed, the transfer of facilities, and the requirements for the discharge of indebtedness of the special district and other conditions and obligations imposed by the court shall be specifically set forth in the order excluding territory from the special district.

The following additional requirements shall be met before any court orders the exclusion of any area from any water, sanitation, or water and sanitation district or any metropolitan district providing water or sanitation services or both:

Such district's outstanding bonds shall not exceed ten percent of the valuation for assessment of the taxable property in the remaining territory of the special district, or, as an alternative, the municipality or the territory excluded from the special district shall discharge that portion of the special district's indebtedness incurred to serve the territory proposed for exclusion or the municipality shall have entered into a contract to purchase the entire system or systems of such district at a price at least sufficient to pay in full all of the outstanding indebtedness of such district and all of the interest thereon.

Provision shall be made that all areas of such district receive the service or services for which such district was organized in substantial compliance and fulfillment of the service plan of the district, if one exists, or in accordance with the petition for organization of such district if no service plan was originally adopted and approved pursuant to part 2 of this article.

If an election in a water, sanitation, or water and sanitation district or a metropolitan district providing water or sanitation services or both has been held pursuant to subsection (7) of this section and the majority of votes cast favor the municipality providing the service, the municipality and such district shall enter into a contract for the municipality to assume full responsibility for the operation and maintenance of the entire system or systems of such district and to integrate said system or systems with those of the municipality to the largest extent possible. The terms and conditions of service and the rates to be charged by the municipality for said service under the contract shall be uniform with the terms, conditions, and rates for similar service provided by said municipality to other users within the municipality.

If no election has been held pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, the following additional requirement shall be met before any court orders the exclusion of any area from any fire protection district: The quality of service including, but not limited to, the fire insurance costs for the improvements within the excluded area will not be adversely affected by such exclusion.

After the filing of a petition for exclusion under subsection (1) of this section, ten percent or one hundred of the eligible electors of the special district territory proposed for exclusion, whichever number is less, may petition the court for a special election to be held within the special district territory proposed for exclusion on the question of exclusion of the territory described in the petition for exclusion. If a petition for a special election is filed with the court and complies with this subsection (5), the court shall order a special election to be held only after it finds the conditions of subsections (2)(a), (2)(c), and (2)(d) and, if applicable, of subsection (3) or (4) of this section are met. The election shall be held and conducted, and the results thereof determined, in the manner provided in article 13.5 of title 1. The special district shall bear the costs of the election.

If a majority of the electors voting at such election approve the question of exclusion, the court shall order the territory excluded from the special district in accordance with its findings on the conditions specified in subsection (2) and, if applicable, of subsection (3) or (4) of this section. If a majority of those voting do not approve the question, the court shall conclusively terminate the exclusion proceeding.

Any order for exclusion of territory from a special district shall become effective on January 1 next following the date the order is entered by the court. The order for exclusion shall recite in the findings a description of any bonded indebtedness in existence immediately preceding the effective date of the order for which the excluded property is liable and the date that such bonded indebtedness is then scheduled to be retired. After July 1, 1993, failure of the order for exclusion to recite the existence and scheduled retirement date of such indebtedness, when due to error or omission by the special district, shall not constitute grounds for correction of the omission of a levy on the excluded property from the assessment roll pursuant to section 39-5-125, C.R.S.

After any exclusion of territory under this section, the court may order an election of the electors of the portion of the special district remaining to determine whether they desire the municipality to provide the service provided by the special district if either of the following conditions exists:

More than fifty percent of the territory within the special district as it existed prior to such exclusion has been excluded; or

The valuation for assessment of the area of the excluded territory is greater than the valuation for assessment of the area of the remaining territory in the special district.

If a majority of the electors voting at such election approve the question requiring the municipality to provide such service, the court shall request the governing body of the municipality and the board to enter into a contract which will govern the providing of the service. The terms and conditions of the contract shall be reviewed and approved by the court, but in no event shall the terms, rates, and conditions be less equitable than for services supplied by a municipality to any other users within the municipality. The court's review of the contract or, if the municipality and the special district after good faith negotiations are unable to agree upon a contract, the court's order shall be in accordance with the criteria set forth in paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) of subsection (2) of this section. The special district shall continue in existence for the purpose of fulfilling any obligation imposed upon it by the contract with the municipality or otherwise.

Any election held pursuant to this subsection (7) shall be held and conducted, and the results thereof determined, in the manner provided in articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1559, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(2)(a) and (2)(b) amended, p. 1110, § 1, effective April 24.

L. 92:

(5)(a) and (7)(c) amended, p. 877, § 111, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(6) amended, p. 83, § 2, effective March 29.

L. 96:

(1)(b) amended, p. 474, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(5)(a) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 785, § 84, effective June 6.

L. 2021:

(5)(a) amended, (SB 21-160), ch. 133, p. 540, § 11, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1981. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

32-1-503. Effect of exclusion order.

Territory excluded from a special district pursuant to the provisions of this part 5 shall not be subject to any property tax levied by the board for the operating costs of the special district. For the purpose of retiring the special district's outstanding indebtedness and the interest thereon existing at the effective date of the exclusion order, the special district shall remain intact, and the excluded territory shall be obligated to the same extent as all other property within the special district but only for that proportion of such outstanding indebtedness and the interest thereon existing immediately prior to the effective date of the exclusion order. The board shall levy annually a property tax on all such excluded and remaining property sufficient, together with other funds and revenues of the special district, to pay such outstanding indebtedness and the interest thereon. The board is also empowered to establish, maintain, enforce, and, from time to time, modify such service charges, tap fees, and other rates, fees, tolls, and charges, upon residents or users in the area of the special district as it existed prior to the exclusion, as may in the discretion of the board be necessary to supplement the proceeds of said tax levies in the payment of the outstanding indebtedness and the interest thereon. In no event shall excluded territory of a special district become obligated for the payment of any bonded indebtedness created after the date of the court's exclusion order.

The change of boundaries of the special district shall not impair nor affect its organization, nor shall it affect, impair, or discharge any contract, obligation, lien, or charge on which it might be liable or chargeable had such change of boundaries not been made.

Notice of the court order of any exclusion accomplished pursuant to this part 5 shall be given in accordance with the provisions of section 32-1-105.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1562, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-308 as it existed prior to 1981.